Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 6 Retirement, Retirement Allowances, Disability Benefits, and Death Benefits

47-7-100.
Eligibility for full pension benefits; eligibility for partial benefits; optional pension benefits; vesting of rights to pension benefits; early retirement provisions.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Selected beneficiary” means any person designated from time to time before or after the approval of an application for retirement by the member in writing on forms prescribed by the board to receive benefits which continue to be payable upon the death of the member.

“Spouse” means the husband or wife to whom the member is validly married under the laws of this state at the time of the approval by the board of an application for retirement or at the time of the approval of a later exercise by such member of an option granted by this Code section and who holds such status at the time benefits became payable to such person on account of the death of a member.

Any eligible member who has attained the age of 55 years and who terminates service as a firefighter or volunteer firefighter after at least 25 years of service, upon application to and approval by the board, shall have a vested right in an amount equal to the maximum monthly retirement benefit in effect on the date the board approves such application. Such benefits shall commence on the date of the member’s termination of service.

Any eligible member who terminates service as a firefighter or volunteer firefighter after 25 years of service, but before reaching the age of 55 years, may, upon filing an application with the board, cease payment of such member’s monthly dues following such termination of service and, upon reaching the age of 55 years and being otherwise eligible, shall be paid a monthly benefit equal to the maximum monthly retirement benefit in effect on the date such member attains the age of 55 years.

Any eligible member who terminates service as a firefighter or volunteer firefighter after at least 15 years of service, upon application to and approval by the board, shall have a vested right in and to a monthly benefit payable for the member’s lifetime equal to a pro rata amount of the maximum monthly retirement benefit provided in subsection (b) of this Code section in effect on the date of such termination of service, which amount shall be determined by the ratio of years served, being not less than 15 nor more than 25, to the full 25 year service retirement. Such benefits shall become payable when the member reaches 55 years of age or when he or she terminates employment as a firefighter or volunteer firefighter, whichever is later.

At any time prior to approval by the board of an application for retirement, a member may elect or may revoke a previous election and make a new election to have monthly benefits payable under one of the options set forth in this subsection, in lieu of the benefits payable under subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section. The benefits shall be paid in accordance with the terms of the option elected. Election of any option shall be made by the member on forms provided by the board and shall be subject to approval by the board, which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld. No optional election is available for payment of disability benefits.

Option A, the joint and survivor option, shall consist of a decreased retirement benefit which shall be payable during the joint lifetime of both the member and the member’s spouse and which shall continue after the death of the member during the lifetime of the spouse in the amount chosen by the member, which amount shall be 100 percent, 75 percent, 66 2/3 percent, or 50 percent of the member’s benefits. Any member who has completed 15 years of creditable service may elect that, in the event of the member’s death prior to receiving any retirement benefits under this chapter, the member’s spouse shall receive decreased retirement benefits in the amount elected by the member, which amount shall be 100 percent, 75 percent, 66 2/3 percent, or 50 percent of the benefits to which the member would have been entitled based upon the member’s creditable service as of the time of the member’s death. The decreased retirement benefits payable to the spouse of a member who dies prior to receiving any retirement benefits under this chapter shall commence on the date the member would have become 55 years of age and shall not be payable unless, prior to the member’s death, the member had elected such benefits in the form and manner prescribed by the board and had filed such election with the board.

Option B, the ten years’ certain and life option, shall consist of a decreased retirement benefit payable to the member during the member’s lifetime; and, in the event of the member’s death within ten years after the member’s retirement, the same monthly benefits shall be payable to the member’s selected beneficiary, or, if the member so elects, the total monthly benefit may be divided equally among up to five selected beneficiaries, for the balance of such ten-year period.

If a member selects Option A, then, after the approval of the application for retirement, the following provisions apply:

If the member’s spouse shall predecease the member, the member may, in writing on forms prescribed by the board and subject to approval by the board, revoke Option A and thereafter receive during the member’s lifetime a monthly retirement benefit commencing on the date on which the board approves such revocation, but not for any period prior to such approval, equal to the maximum monthly benefit which would have been payable to him had such option not been exercised;

If there is entered a final judgment of complete divorce between the member and the member’s spouse, the member may, in writing on forms prescribed by the board and subject to approval by the board, revoke Option A and thereafter receive during the member’s lifetime a monthly retirement benefit commencing on the date on which the board approves such revocation, but not for any period prior to such approval, equal to the maximum monthly benefit which would have been payable had such option not been exercised; and

If, following the death of the member’s spouse or the entry of a final judgment of divorce between the member and the member’s spouse, the member remarries, the member may, in writing on forms prescribed by the board and subject to approval by the board, elect Option A with respect to the member’s new spouse. The joint and survivor benefit shall be determined as of the date of the election.

The amount of any optional retirement benefit set forth in this subsection shall be the actuarial equivalent of the amount of the benefit that would otherwise be payable to the member under subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section based upon the interest rate and mortality basis approved from time to time by the board, the age of the member, and, if applicable, the age of his spouse as of the date benefits are to commence or as of the date benefits would have commenced if the member had retired after first becoming eligible for full benefits, whichever is earlier, but the optional benefits available under Option A shall be calculated without regard to the provisions of paragraph (3) of this subsection.

Any eligible member who retires after July 1, 1984, shall be entitled to an increase in the maximum monthly retirement benefit in effect at the time of his or her retirement under this Code section equal to 1 percent of the monthly retirement benefit for which the member would have been otherwise eligible for each full year of creditable service while a member of the fund as a firefighter or volunteer firefighter in excess of 25 years of creditable service.

Any eligible member who retires after July 1, 2002, shall be entitled to an increase in the maximum monthly retirement benefit in effect at the time of his or her retirement under this Code section equal to 2 percent of the monthly retirement benefit for which the member would have been otherwise eligible for each full year of creditable service while a member of the fund as a firefighter or volunteer firefighter in excess of 25 years of creditable service. Such increase shall be the total increase allowed by this subsection.

Any eligible member who would be entitled to the commencement of retirement benefits upon reaching age 55 under subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section may elect to retire after reaching the age of 50 but before reaching the age of 55 and immediately commence the drawing of retirement benefits and in that event the member shall be eligible immediately upon retirement for a reduced monthly pension benefit in an amount determined by multiplying the benefit for which the member would have been otherwise entitled under subsections (b), (c), and (e) of this Code section had the member delayed retirement or the commencement of benefits until the member reached age 55, such benefit to be determined as of the date of the member’s actual retirement or first receipt of the monthly retirement benefit by the factor set forth below:

Click to view

The option available under this subsection may also be exercised by a surviving spouse who is the beneficiary of an Option A election with respect to the benefits payable to the spouse in the event the member dies prior to receiving any benefits and would have been able to exercise the option available under this subsection.

Effective July 1, 1988, the maximum monthly retirement benefit for any person who retires on or after that date shall be $500.00.

Effective July 1, 1988, the maximum monthly retirement benefit which was payable under this Code section immediately prior to that date shall be increased in the amount of $85.00 per month, and the monthly retirement benefit of each person who retired under this chapter prior to that date or the monthly benefit of any surviving spouse or selected beneficiary who was receiving a benefit prior to that date shall be increased by a percentage of $85.00 which is equal to the percentage that the retired person’s, surviving spouse’s, or selected beneficiary’s monthly benefit payable immediately prior to July 1, 1988, bore to the maximum monthly benefit payable under this Code section immediately prior to July 1, 1988.

Effective July 1, 1990, the monthly retirement benefit for any person who retires on or after that date under this Code section shall be $570.00.

Effective July 1, 1990, the maximum monthly retirement benefit which would otherwise be payable to persons retired under this Code section prior to July 1, 1990, shall be increased by the amount of $40.00 per month, and the monthly retirement benefit of each person who retired under this chapter prior to that date or the monthly benefit of any surviving spouse or selected beneficiary who was receiving a benefit prior to that date shall be increased by a percentage of $40.00 which is equal to the percentage that the retired person’s, surviving spouse’s, or selected beneficiary’s monthly benefit payable immediately prior to July 1, 1990, bore to the maximum monthly benefit otherwise payable to such person under this Code section prior to July 1, 1990.

Effective July 1, 2000, the monthly benefit for any member who retired on or before February 25, 1976, under subsection (b) of this Code section shall be no less than $500.00. The monthly benefit of any member retiring on or before such date under a retirement option providing for less than a full service pension, or the beneficiary of any such member, shall be calculated on an amount not less than $500.00.

If any member who has not elected an option under subsection (d) of this Code section dies after accruing at least 15 years of creditable service but before applying for retirement as provided in this Code section, and such member is survived by a spouse, the surviving spouse shall be entitled to receive a benefit as if the member had elected to receive 100 percent of the member’s benefits under Option A as provided in paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of this Code section. Such benefits shall commence on the date the deceased member would have reached the age of 55 years or, at the option of the surviving spouse, on the date the deceased member would have reached the age of 50 years in accordance with the provisions of subsection (f) of this Code section.

If any member who has not elected an option under subsection (d) of this Code section dies after accruing at least 15 years of creditable service but before applying for retirement as provided in this Code section, and such member is not survived by a spouse, up to five selected beneficiaries shall be entitled to receive a benefit, equally apportioned among the selected beneficiaries, as if the member had elected to receive Option B as provided in paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of this Code section.

If any member who has elected an option under subsection (d) of this Code section dies after accruing at least 15 years of creditable service but before applying for retirement as provided for in this Code section, the benefits shall be paid in accordance with the option so elected.

If the Member’s Age At The Early Retirement Retirement (determined by Factor Is: the member’s age at the member’s immediately preceding birthday) Is: 50 .70 51 .76 52 .82 53 .88 54 .94

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 339, § 7; Ga. L. 1957, p. 323, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 991, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 242, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 441, § 4; Ga. L. 1970, p. 334, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 332, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 186, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 235, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 364, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 608, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1984, p. 990, § 5; Ga. L. 1988, p. 338, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 554, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 130, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 755, § 9; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3010, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 703, § 4; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1376, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 149, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 562, §§ 6, 7; Ga. L. 2002, p. 590, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 438, § 5/HB 1150; Ga. L. 2015, p. 898, § 10/HB 266.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted the former last sentence of subparagraph (d)(3)(C) which read: “No such election shall be made until the expiration of one year after the date of remarriage or until a child of the remarried couple is born, whichever is earlier.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in paragraph (d)(2), inserted “, or, if the member so elects, the total monthly benefit may be divided equally among up to five selected beneficiaries,”; and in paragraph (h)(2), substituted “up to five selected beneficiaries shall be entitled to receive a benefit, equally apportioned among the selected beneficiaries,” for “the selected beneficiary shall be entitled to receive a benefit”.

47-7-101.
Eligibility for retirement benefits; withdrawal of application for benefits before approval; reemployment.

Any member who applies for retirement benefits may withdraw such application at any time prior to its approval by the board.

Any person who again becomes a paid employee of a fire department or of a volunteer fire department after having been placed on retirement or disability under Code Section 47-7-100 or 47-7-102 shall immediately notify the executive director of such reemployment. Retirement benefits being paid to such person shall be suspended as of the date of such reemployment and shall remain suspended until such reemployment terminates at which time the payment of retirement benefits shall be resumed in the amount to which the person was eligible at the time of reemployment. Disability benefits being paid to any such person shall be terminated as of the date of such reemployment. Within six months of the commencement of reemployment, any such person who at the time of application otherwise meets the requirements for membership may, by application in the manner provided by this chapter, become a member of the fund. In the event the application is granted, such member, upon meeting the requirements provided by law, shall be entitled to all benefits provided for in Code Section 47-7-100, but the amount of monthly retirement or disability benefits payable to such member shall not exceed the amount of the monthly benefit which would be payable to such member had such subsequent retirement become effective at the time of the member’s prior retirement, unless after such reemployment the member shall have acquired not less than seven years’creditable service as a member of the fund.

A member who is eligible to receive a benefit under Code Section 47-7-100 shall not be entitled to benefits under Code Section 47-7-102.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 991, § 3; Ga. L. 1976, p. 241, § 6; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1310, § 3; Ga. L. 1991, p. 755, § 10; Ga. L. 1993, p. 476, § 5; Ga. L. 2005, p. 54, § 3/HB 355.

47-7-102.
Eligibility for disability benefits; notice of injury; application for benefits; periodic medical examinations; termination of benefits; action contesting determination of board.

Any firefighter or volunteer firefighter who, while a dues-paying member of this fund, is rendered totally and permanently physically disabled by injuries suffered while performing the duties of the position to which he was regularly assigned, so as to be unable physically to perform substantially all of the duties of that position to which he was regularly assigned when the disability originated and who, as a result of such physical disability, is separated from his work as a firefighter or his appointment as a volunteer firefighter shall be entitled to the maximum monthly disability benefit in effect on the date of the filing of his application for such benefit until his disability ceases or until the happening of one or more of the events set forth in subsection (f) of this Code section, provided that such firefighter or volunteer firefighter:

Gives notice to the board within 12 months of the date on which such injuries are suffered on such form as the board may prescribe that he has suffered physical injuries on which a disability application may be filed; and

Makes application to the board for such benefit within 12 months of the date on which he is separated from his employment as a firefighter or his appointment as a volunteer firefighter as a result of such total and permanent disability.

Such benefit shall be payable from the beginning of the seventh calendar month after the date of such separation or the date of application, whichever is later.

Any firefighter who, while a dues-paying member of this fund, is rendered, by heart disease or respiratory disease, totally and permanently disabled so as to be unable to perform substantially all of the duties of the position to which he was regularly assigned and who, as a result of such disability, is separated from his work as a firefighter shall be entitled to the maximum monthly disability benefit in effect on the date of the filing of his application for such benefit until his disability ceases or until the happening of one or more of the events set forth in subsection (f) of this Code section, provided that:

Such firefighter makes application to the board for such benefit within 12 months of the date on which he is separated from his employment as a firefighter as a result of such total and permanent disability; and

Such firefighter shall have been a member in good standing of the fund for five consecutive years immediately prior to his application for disability.

Such benefit shall be payable from the beginning of the seventh calendar month after the date of disability or the date of application, whichever is later.

Any volunteer firefighter shall be eligible for the disability benefit afforded firefighters under subsection (b) of this Code section upon separation from his appointment as a volunteer firefighter on account of such disability, in the same manner and upon the same conditions such benefits would be available to a firefighter, provided that, in addition, such volunteer firefighter:

Has lawfully become a member of the fund and has been a member in good standing for ten consecutive years immediately prior to his application for a disability benefit; and

Has at least 15 years of creditable service as a firefighter or volunteer firefighter.

No benefit shall be payable under this Code section for any disability which results from or is attributable to:

Chronic and excessive consumption of alcoholic beverages;

Addiction to drugs, the use of which drugs is prohibited in this state by law;

Engagement by the member in any criminal act;

Mental, emotional, or psychological illness or condition;

Injury sustained by the member while serving on active duty in the armed forces or while on active duty in the National Guard or other armed forces reserve unit; or

An illness, disease, or physical injury or abnormality existing or suffered prior to current membership in the fund or the aggravation of such preexisting illness, disease, or physical injury or abnormality.

Once each year during the first five years following the commencement of a disability benefit under this Code section and once in every three-year period thereafter, the board may require a disability beneficiary to undergo a medical examination, such examination to be made at his place of residence or other place mutually agreed upon, by a physician or physicians designated by the board. Such disability benefit recipient himself may request such an examination. The designated physician or physicians shall report to the board, following each examination, the current status and condition of the benefit recipient’s disability.

A disabled member’s disability benefit shall cease:

If he returns to service with a fire department in this state or any municipality or other political subdivision thereof;

If he refuses to submit to any medical examination required under this Code section; and the benefit shall remain discontinued until the member’s withdrawal of such refusal and submission to the requested medical examination, provided that if his refusal continues for one year, all his rights in and to any disability benefit may be revoked by the board;

If, within the first 24 months after the commencement of disability benefits under this Code section, the member does in fact obtain gainful employment in any occupation compensating him, in the case of a firefighter, at 75 percent or more of the compensation for the position he occupied payable at the time of the member’s separation from employment because of such disability but increased at the simple rate of 3 percent per annum during the period of such disability or, in the case of a volunteer firefighter, at the rate of $10,000.00 per annum, increased by the simple rate of 3 percent per annum from January 1, 1991.

If, following 24 months after the commencement of disability benefits under this Code section, the board determines that the member either:

Earns in fact in any occupation or, based upon any medical examination, is able to earn in any occupation, in the case of a firefighter, at least one-half of the annual compensation the member was receiving as a firefighter immediately prior to separation from employment or position on account of such disability, increased by the simple rate of 3 percent per annum of the date of separation or, in the case of a volunteer firefighter, the sum of $7,500.00 per annum, increased by the simple rate of 3 percent per annum commencing January 1, 1991; or

In fact, performs in any occupation or, based upon any medical examination, is able to perform in any occupation substantially all of the duties of any occupation on at least a one-half time basis;

If the board determines, on the basis of any medical examination, that the member has sufficiently recovered from his disability so as again to be able to perform substantially the duties of the position to which he was last regularly assigned prior to the time of separation on account of disability so as to be able to engage in any occupation or gainful employment for which he is reasonably suited by virtue of his background, training, education, and experience; or

When he dies.

The board shall prescribe and furnish a form and procedure for the application for a disability benefit. Upon receipt of an application the board may pass upon and decide whether to grant or deny the application on the basis of the submitted information. The board may also request that additional physicians’ reports be submitted by the applicant or may request that the applicant for a disability benefit appear personally before the board. Receipt by the applicant of a disability benefit or payments under the federal Social Security Act or any local pension Acts may be considered by the board as evidence of eligibility for a disability benefit under this Code section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of Code Section 47-7-124, no action shall be brought or pending action maintained contesting any determination of the board with respect to any matter under this Code section or any predecessor statute unless such action is or had been initiated within one year after the determination of the board.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, effective April 1, 1989, the maximum monthly disability benefit for any person who had retired on disability on or after July 1, 1988, shall be $335.00 per month commencing April 1, 1989.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection (i), effective April 1, 1989, the monthly disability benefit to which any person who had retired before July 1, 1988, would be otherwise entitled shall be increased by the amount of $120.00 per month commencing April 1, 1989.

Effective on April 1, 1989, the monthly disability benefit to which any person who retired on disability before April 1, 1989, would be otherwise entitled shall be increased by $120.00 per month commencing April 1, 1989, but such increase shall be paid only for the number of months between July 1, 1988, and April 1, 1989, during which such person received disability benefits after which the payments pursuant to this paragraph shall cease.

Effective July 1, 1990, the maximum monthly disability retirement benefit for any person who retires under this Code section on or after that date shall be $375.00.

Effective July 1, 1990, the maximum monthly retirement benefit which would otherwise be payable to persons retired under this Code section prior to July 1, 1990, shall be increased in the amount of $40.00 per month.

Effective July 1, 2000, the monthly benefit for any member who retires under this Code section shall be no less than $500.00.

Any other provision of this Code section to the contrary notwithstanding, no member who is an active member of the fund on July 1, 1993, and no member who becomes an active member of the fund or who again becomes an active member of the fund on or after July 1, 1993, shall be entitled to any benefits under this Code section; provided, however, that any person who is receiving benefits pursuant to the provisions of this Code section on such date shall continue to be eligible to receive such benefits under the terms and conditions provided in this Code section; provided, further, that any member who has timely given notice to the board or who has timely made application to the board for disability benefits in accordance with this Code section prior to July 1, 1993, shall, upon approval of the application for such benefits, continue to be eligible for such benefits pursuant to the provisions of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 323, § 2; Ga. L. 1960, p. 991, § 4; Ga. L. 1961, p. 417, § 4; Ga. L. 1966, p. 242, § 2; Ga. L. 1968, p. 441, § 5; Ga. L. 1970, p. 334, § 2; Ga. L. 1971, p. 332, § 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 186, § 2; Ga. L. 1976, p. 235, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 608, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1310, § 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 209, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 50, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 339, § 4; Ga. L. 1990, p. 554, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 130, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 476, § 6; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1376, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 562, § 8.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1989, p. 50, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Pursuant to the authority of Code Section 47-20-63 [repealed], this Act is not subject to the requirements of Chapter 20 of Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, known as the ‘Public Retirement Systems Standards Law,’ and pursuant to the former provisions of said Code Section 47-20-63 the General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) It is necessary for this Act to become effective without delay in order to avoid hardship to members and retired members of the Georgia Firemen’s Pension Fund;

“(2) The Georgia Firemen’s Pension Fund is actuarially sound; and

“(3) That the changes in Chapter 7 of Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated providing for the Georgia Firemen’s Pension Fund which are accomplished by this Act will be fully financed by the Georgia Firemen’s Pension Fund without the necessity of any appropriation by the General Assembly and without adversely affecting the actuarial soundness of the Georgia Firemen’s Pension Fund.”

47-7-103.
Benefits payable upon death; failure to designate beneficiary.

In the event of the death of an active member who has not commenced receiving any benefits under this chapter, up to five selected beneficiaries of such deceased member shall be entitled to be paid the amount of $10,000.00 split equally among the selected beneficiaries, upon any selected beneficiary making proper application to the executive director of the fund. Such application shall be accompanied by a certified copy of the death certificate of the deceased member and such other information as may be required by the board.

In the event of the death of a retired member of the fund who has not elected survivor benefits under Option A or B as provided for in subsection (d) of Code Section 47-7-100 and who has commenced receiving benefits under this chapter, but who has not received total benefits in an amount equal to $10,000.00, up to five beneficiaries selected by the member shall be entitled to receive an equally apportioned amount from the difference between $10,000.00 and the amount of benefits received by such deceased member, upon making application as provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section.

In the event of the death of an active member or a retired member who failed to designate a beneficiary, or if all named beneficiaries have predeceased such member, any benefits otherwise payable under subsections (a) or (b) of this Code section shall be payable to such member’s estate.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 368, § 6; Ga. L. 1962, p. 550, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 562, § 9; Ga. L. 2010, p. 438, § 6/HB 1150; Ga. L. 2015, p. 898, § 11/HB 266; Ga. L. 2019, p. 760, § 1/HB 319; Ga. L. 2020, p. 13, § 1/HB 195.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “executive director” for “secretary-treasurer” near the end of the first sentence of subsection (a) and inserted “, who has not elected survivor benefits under Option A or B as provided for in subsection (d) of Code Section 47-7-100,” near the beginning of subsection (b).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “(a) In the event of the death of a member of the fund who is in good standing and who has not commenced receiving any benefits under this chapter, the designated beneficiary of such deceased member shall be entitled to be paid the amount of $5,000.00, upon making proper application to the executive director of the fund. Such application shall be accompanied by a certified copy of the death certificate of the deceased member and such other information as may be required by the board.

“(b) In the event of the death of a member of the fund who is in good standing, who has not elected survivor benefits under Option A or B as provided for in subsection (d) of Code Section 47-7-100, and who has commenced receiving benefits under this chapter, but who has not received total benefits in an amount equal to $5,000.00, the member’s named beneficiary shall be entitled to receive the difference between $5,000.00 and the amount of benefits received by such deceased member, upon making application as provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added subsection (c).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “$10,000.00” for “$5,000.00” in the middle of the first sentence of subsection (a) and twice in subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 13, § 1/HB 195 purported to amend the entire Code section but only amended subsections (a) and (b).

47-7-104.
Benefits payable to volunteer firefighters erroneously found to be eligible for such benefits.

Any other provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding:

Any person who served as a volunteer firefighter prior to March 3, 1955, and who began receiving retirement benefits at a later date from the fund, based on the board of trustees’ belief that such person was eligible for such benefits, but whose retirement benefits were ceased or canceled by the board of trustees based upon its subsequent realization that such person was not in fact eligible for such benefits; or

Any person who left service as a volunteer firefighter after receiving written notice from the executive director of the fund that such person was eligible for retirement benefits except for not having reached the age of 60 years, which written notice was later determined by the board to be erroneous,

shall be eligible to receive the retirement benefits under this chapter in the same manner as if such service had been rendered in a class nine or better fire department, regardless of the fact that such service was not rendered in a class nine or better fire department.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 973, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1376, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 438, § 7/HB 1150.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “executive director of the fund that such person” for “secretary-treasurer of the fund that he” near the beginning of paragraph (2) and substituted “nine” for “eight” twice in the ending undesignated paragraph.

47-7-105.
Refund of contributions upon withdrawal from the fund.

Upon proper application and approval of the board, any member who withdraws from the fund shall be paid all the moneys such individual contributed to the fund, less 5 percent.
Any refunds granted under this Code section or any other provision of this chapter shall be without interest.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 339, § 11; Ga. L. 1991, p. 755, § 11.